Wyoming statutes. Constitution of the State of Wyoming
Article 1. Declaration of Rights
Where testimonial statements from a deceased victim that implicated defendant in the charges brought were at issue, the only indicium of reliability sufficient to satisfy constitutional demands was the one the constitution actually prescribed, namely, confrontation. Because the appellate court was not convinced beyond a reasonable doubt that the admission of the hearsay statements of the victim did not contribute to defendant's conviction, the conviction was reversed. Sarr v. State, 2005 WY 67, 113 P.3d 1051,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 78

(Wyo. 2005).

Receipt into evidence in joint trial of one coactor's declaration implicating another coactor,

under the exception to the hearsay rule that a statement by a coconspirator of a party during the course and in furtherance of the conspiracy is not hearsay, does not violate the other coactor's constitutional right of confrontation. Jasch v. State, 563 P.2d 1327,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 247

(Wyo. 1977), commented on in XIII Land & Water L. Rev. 629 (1978).

Where there is concerted action between codefendants, evidence of the declarations of one, during and in furtherance of the common design or plan, is admissible against the other defendants, even though no conspiracy is charged. And where a joint venture is shown, declarations made during and in furtherance of the venture are admissible against the party not present even though no conspiracy is alleged. Jasch v. State, 563 P.2d 1327,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 247

(Wyo. 1977), commented on in XIII Land & Water L. Rev. 629 (1978).

No challenge allowed to co-conspirator's out-of-court-statement.
—

There can be no challenge under the confrontation clause to the admission of a co-conspirator's out-of-court statement. Such statements clearly fall outside the compass of the general hearsay exclusion. Jandro v. State, 781 P.2d 512,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 212

(Wyo. 1989).

There must be evidence showing conspiracy, other than coconspirator's statement alone.

Jasch v. State, 563 P.2d 1327,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 247

(Wyo. 1977), commented on in XIII Land & Water L. Rev. 629 (1978).

Fairness standard requires impartial jurors. —

The exposure of the jury panel to information by a prospective juror that the accused was possibly involved in another crime is the type of situation which requires unfair prejudice to be presumed and requires the jury panel be disqualified. Miller v. State, 904 P.2d 344,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 188

(Wyo. 1995).

District court
did not abuse its discretion by denying defendant's motion for a
mistrial
as fairness and impartiality were not lost when a potential
juror
expressed an opinion that defendant should be locked up because
the
district court also took appropriate curative measures by dismissing
the potential juror for cause, instructing the members of the jury
pool to disregard the statement, and, at the behest of defense counsel,
advising the jury pool on the presumption of innocence. Brown v. State, 2015 WY 4, 340 P.3d 1020,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 2015).

In a child
sexual abuse case, the district court did not abuse its discretion
by denying defendant's motion for a mistrial as defendant was not
deprived of a fair and impartial jury because all the venire who
became
emotional while explaining the source of their concerns for
serving
on the jury were excused for cause; and the record did not
indicate
that the other potential jurors became biased because they
observed
those excused as defendant was acquitted of three of the
four counts
of child sexual abuse against him, which supported a
conclusion that
the jury decided the case based upon the evidence. Brown v. State, 2015 WY 4, 340 P.3d 1020,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 2015).

Juror cannot hear separate trials of defendants. —

Where two persons charged with a crime arising out of the same transaction are granted separate trials, a juror hearing the trial of the first defendant is not qualified as a juror for the subsequent trial of the second defendant, the reason being that the juror has formed or expressed an opinion upon the merits of the case. The refusal to excuse such an unqualified juror for cause is prejudicial where the defendant challenges the juror for cause, the court denies the challenge, the defendant does not accept the jury because of it, and he exhausts his peremptory challenges. Lee v. State, 743 P.2d 296,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 513

(Wyo. 1987).

Evidence admissible under “open door doctrine” is not violation of constitutional right to confront witnesses.

Sanville v. State, 593 P.2d 1340,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 401

(Wyo. 1979).

Invited error doctrine may require inquiry into off-limits
matter. —

Where application of the invited error doctrine would be tantamount to waiver of the right of confrontation, purposeful rather than inadvertent inquiry into off-limits matter is required for application of the rule. Sanville v. State, 593 P.2d 1340,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 401

(Wyo. 1979).

Right to compulsory process. —

There was no error in trial court's failure to comply fully with
pro se defendant's approximately 62 motions asking that subpoenas be issued for witnesses for the defense;
defendant's right to summon witnesses in his defense was not violated, where even many witnesses for whom defendant could not provide a street/delivery address were sought and served, if possible, and the record showed all witnesses material to his defense were available to be called to the witness stand. Lemus v. State, 2007 WY 111, 162 P.3d 497,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 120

(Wyo. 2007).

Violation of compulsory process does not automatically create
reversible error. —

Violation of the provision of this section as to compulsory process for obtaining witnesses does not automatically create reversible error. State v. Spears, 76 Wyo. 82, 300 P.2d 551,

1956 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo. 1956).

Failure to serve amended information not error. —

Amendment to information charging armed robbery, so as to allege the ownership of the property taken, was one of form and not of substance, so that no error occurred in proceeding with the trial without service of the amended information on the accused or a plea thereto. Valerio v. State, 445 P.2d 752,

1968 Wyo. LEXIS 203

(Wyo. 1968).

Speedy trial clause seeks to protect accused against inability to defend himself

and when this protection breaks down, prejudice becomes identifiable. Cherniwchan v. State, 594 P.2d 464,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 406

(Wyo. 1979).

And speedy trial guarantee reaches out to protect rights of convicts.

Cherniwchan v. State, 594 P.2d 464,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 406

(Wyo. 1979).

Primary purpose of right to speedy trial

under this section is to prevent the defendant's right to a fair trial from being substantially impaired by pretrial delay. A violation of the right to a speedy trial precludes the establishment of guilt by trial, but it does not preclude the valid establishment of guilt by a voluntary plea. Zanetti v. State, 783 P.2d 134,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 232

(Wyo. 1989).

There is no precise length of delay that automatically constitutes constitutional violation

of the speedy trial right. Phillips v. State, 597 P.2d 456,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 497

(Wyo. 1979).

Delay due to failure to accept a plea was contrary to law.
—

Defendant's constitutional right to a speedy trial was violated by his continuous incarceration for 720 days. This delay was due largely in part to the district court's refusal to accept defendant's nolo contendere plea because of his unwillingness to concede that he committed the crime of aggravated assault with a deadly weapon without provocation. This is contrary to Wyoming law and, thus, constituted an error of law. Berry v. State, 2004 WY 81, 93 P.3d 222,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 106

(Wyo. 2004).

Wyoming has no statute of limitations as to commencement of criminal prosecutions.

Boggs v. State, 484 P.2d 711,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 216

(Wyo. 1971).

Speedy trial clause has no application to prearrest delay.

Black v. State, 820 P.2d 969,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 172

(Wyo. 1991).

Right to speedy trial effectuated. —

Statute requiring accused person to be tried within specified times or discharged makes effective this section, guaranteeing a speedy trial, and constitutes a legislative declaration of what is a reasonable delay. State v. Keefe, 17 Wyo. 227, 98 P. 122,

1908 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 1908).

Statute providing for accused's discharge unless tried before end of third term is reasonable legislative declaration of “reasonable time” to secure speedy trial. State v. Levand, 37 Wyo. 372, 262 P. 24,

1927 Wyo. LEXIS 94

(Wyo. 1927), reh'g denied, 37 Wyo. 372, 262 P. 24,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1928).

Speedy trial not denied.—

Defendant's right to a speedy trial was not violated because the reason for the delay—competency examinations, refiling of the indictment, and trial scheduling concerns—was a neutral factor, while defendant's assertion of the speedy trial right weighed only slightly in defendant's favor. The prejudice factor weighed heavily in the State of Wyoming's favor, as defendant failed to provide any facts or argument, other than general assertions, that defendant was in any way prejudiced. Webb v. State, 2017 WY 108, 401 P.3d 914,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 114

(Wyo. 2017).

Considerations in determining presence of prejudice. —

In determining whether a defendant has suffered actual prejudice from delay in having his case come to trial, the court should consider the oppressiveness of pretrial incarceration, unusual pretrial anxieties and any impairment of a defense to be offered. Grable v. State, 649 P.2d 663,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 371

(Wyo. 1982), overruled in part, Vlahos v. State, 2003 WY 103, 75 P.3d 628,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 124

(Wyo. 2003).

In establishing a constitutional violation of the right to a speedy trial, the trial court will consider: (1) length of incarceration; (2) pretrial anxiety; and (3) impairment of defense. Springfield v. State, 860 P.2d 435,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 149

(Wyo. 1993).

When speedy trial right for second trial accrues. —

Following a reversal and remand by the supreme court, a defendant's speedy trial right begins to accrue, for purposes of the second trial, when the mandate of reversal is issued and filed in the district court. Grable v. State, 649 P.2d 663,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 371

(Wyo. 1982), overruled in part, Vlahos v. State, 2003 WY 103, 75 P.3d 628,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 124

(Wyo. 2003).

Court erred by dismissing a charge on speedy trial grounds because the 24-year gap between the dismissal of the first charge and the filing of the second charge was excluded from the speedy trial clock; defendant was not held in custody during that time, and therefore the time between the dismissal and recharging was not counted. State v. Humphrey, 2005 WY 131, 120 P.3d 1027,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 156

(Wyo. 2005), cert. denied, 546 U.S. 1139, 126 S. Ct. 1152, 163 L. Ed. 2d 1002, 2006 U.S. LEXIS 796 (U.S. 2006).

Demand for speedy trial required. —

A demand must be made by a defendant to take advantage of the right for a speedy trial.
Shafsky v. Casper, 487 P.2d 468,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 236

(Wyo. 1971).

Determination of unnecessary delay in affording trial. —

Where the question to be decided is whether there were unnecessary delays in affording an accused a trial, each case must be determined on its own peculiar facts and circumstances, and factors to be considered are: length of delay, the reason for delay, the defendant's assertion of his right and prejudice to the defendant. Cosco v. State, 503 P.2d 1403,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 290

(Wyo. 1972), cert. denied, 411 U.S. 971, 93 S. Ct. 2164, 36 L. Ed. 2d 693, 1973 U.S. LEXIS 2578 (U.S. 1973).

Each case involving the question as to whether a speedy trial has been granted must be considered upon its own peculiar facts. Hurst v. State, 563 P.2d 232,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 251

(Wyo. 1977), overruled in part, Wilson v. State, 655 P.2d 1246,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 407

(Wyo. 1982).

Four factors which must be considered in determining whether a speedy trial has been granted are length of delay; reason for delay; defendant's assertion of his right; and prejudice to defendant. These are to be considered together, along with any other relevant circumstances, in a determination of this question. Hurst v. State, 563 P.2d 232,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 251

(Wyo. 1977), overruled in part, Wilson v. State, 655 P.2d 1246,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 407

(Wyo. 1982); Cherniwchan v. State, 594 P.2d 464,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 406

(Wyo. 1979); Phillips v. State, 597 P.2d 456,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 497

(Wyo. 1979); Robinson v. State, 627 P.2d 168,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 328

(Wyo. 1981); Heinrich v. State, 638 P.2d 641,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 405

(Wyo. 1981).

Speedy trial analysis requires balancing of four factors: (1) The length of the delay; (2) the reason for the delay; (3) the defendant's assertion of her speedy trial right; and (4) the prejudice to the defendant. Phillips v. State, 835 P.2d 1062,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 76

(Wyo. 1992), reh'g denied,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 84

(Wyo. July 8, 1992).

When the length of the delay is neither “presumptively prejudicial” nor significantly long, no further analysis is warranted. Phillips v. State, 835 P.2d 1062,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 76

(Wyo. 1992), reh'g denied,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 84

(Wyo. July 8, 1992).

Although it is not an essential element that there be a demand on the part of the defendant for a speedy trial, nor is it necessary affirmatively to show prejudice as a result of such delay, it is eminently proper in determining this question to consider these factors and the reasons therefor. Hurst v. State, 563 P.2d 232,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 251

(Wyo. 1977), overruled in part, Wilson v. State, 655 P.2d 1246,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 407

(Wyo. 1982).

Reasonable continuances allowed for counsel's convenience.
—

Acceptable continuances for a reasonable time for convenience of counsel are appropriate to extend the speedy trial time limitations within the continued responsibility of the trial court.
DeSpain v. State, 774 P.2d 77,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 109

(Wyo. 1989).

107-day delay unconscionable. —

A 107-day delay between the time when the defendants were arrested and the time when they were brought before the magistrate is so long as to be unconscionable. Cherniwchan v. State, 594 P.2d 464,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 406

(Wyo. 1979).

And 95-day delay justifies further inquiry. —

Where the record shows that there was an interval of 95 days from the date of defendant's arrest and the date of the preliminary hearing, during which period of time he was in jail, the delay is sufficient to justify further inquiry into whether or not he was given a speedy trial. Phillips v. State, 597 P.2d 456,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 497

(Wyo. 1979).

But lengthy delay not conclusive of violation. —

A lengthy delay in and of itself does not give rise to a per se conclusion that defendant's right to a speedy trial was violated. Heinrich v. State, 638 P.2d 641,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 405

(Wyo. 1981).

District court properly denied defendant's motion to dismiss his trial for sexual assault based on an alleged violation of defendant's constitutional right to a speedy trial where a 235 day delay occurred between defendant's waiver of the preliminary hearing and defendant's arraignment. The time period was not presumptively prejudicial and only 120 days was shown to have been attributable to the State, the other days being attributable to defendant's dissatisfaction with the assignment of judges and the resulting docketing issues, and defendant was not incarcerated and had made little or no effort to locate witnesses. Walters v. State, 2004 WY 37, 87 P.3d 793,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 43

(Wyo. 2004).

Defendant was not denied his constitutional right to a speedy trial under the Sixth Amendment and Wyo. Const. Art. 1, § 10 because, although a delay of nearly a year warranted careful analysis, the delay was not so excessive that it resulted in a presumption of prejudice. Defendant had suffered prejudice because of the length of his pretrial incarceration, but the critical factor was the parties' contributions to the delay, and defendant had demanded and received a special prosecutor and new defense counsel and his part in the delay weighed against finding that his constitutional right was violated. Sisneros v. State, 2005 WY 139, 121 P.3d 790,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 164

(Wyo. 2005), reh'g denied,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 172

(Wyo. Nov. 15, 2005).

Burden of proving delay. —

Burden of proving prejudicial delay from a speedy trial violation lies with the defendant. Berry v. State, 2004 WY 81, 93 P.3d 222,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 106

(Wyo. 2004).

Eighteen-month delay following complaint denies speedy-trial
right. —

A delay of over one and one-half years between the filing of the criminal complaint and the subsequent trial violated the defendant's constitutionally guaranteed right to a speedy trial, where none of the causes for the delay could be attributed to the defendant. Harvey v. State, 774 P.2d 87,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 111

(Wyo. 1989), reh'g denied,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 151

(Wyo. June 12, 1989).

The defendant was denied the right to a speedy trial where, of the 18 months taken to bring him to trial following the initial complaint, the defendant was jointly responsible for three, or perhaps four, months of the delay, with a balance of at least 14 months for which the state offered no plausible explanation or justification. Phillips v. State, 774 P.2d 118,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 110

(Wyo. 1989), reh'g denied,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 152

(Wyo. June 12, 1989).

Absence of specific reasons in record for delay. —

The mere absence of specific reasons in the record for delay does not require a finding that such delay was purposely caused by the state. Heinrich v. State, 638 P.2d 641,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 405

(Wyo. 1981).

Pretrial delay not unconstitutional. —

In a prosecution for delivery of a controlled substance, defendant's rights to a speedy trial under this section were not violated by a pretrial delay of 276 days since the defendant failed to show that any significant delay was not due to his own refusal to waive extradition or that the detriment of four and a half months of unemployment was due to an unreasonable state practice. Fortner v. State, 843 P.2d 1139,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 177

(Wyo. 1992).

Relief for pre-charging delay foreclosed. —

Defendant's failure to demonstrate substantial prejudice to fair trial rights and the presence of some intentional effort to obtain a tactical advantage due to the delay forecloses relief for pre-charging delay. Vernier v. State, 909 P.2d 1344,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1996).

A prearrest delay

may impair the capacity of the accused to prepare his defense, but where the delay itself does not raise the presumption of prejudice, the petitioner has the burden of alleging more than the mere conclusion that he was “greatly prejudiced” to be entitled to an evidentiary hearing. Boggs v. State, 484 P.2d 711,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 216

(Wyo. 1971).

Speedy trial denied. —

Where defense counsel at arraignment on May 9, 1972, suggested to the trial court that a trial date could be set when his motions were heard; the court then advised that it could not tell definitely when a jury would be called, and that it could be “this summer, but in the greater likelihood it is going to be this fall;” the prosecutor did nothing to expedite trial; and nothing intervened from June, 1972, to August, 1973, to cause a delay in trial which began in September, 1973, the state, not having shown good cause for the delay or that it was necessary, deprived the defendants of their state and federal constitutional right to a speedy trial. Stuebgen v. State, 548 P.2d 870,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 181

(Wyo. 1976).

Speedy trial not denied. —

Defendants were not denied speedy trial where trial was had within first term after venue was changed. State v. Levand, 37 Wyo. 372, 262 P. 24,

1927 Wyo. LEXIS 94

(Wyo. 1927), reh'g denied, 37 Wyo. 372, 262 P. 24,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1928).

A delay of approximately 14 months from the date of crime, where the case was tried approximately one year after the preliminary hearing, was not unconstitutional. Hurst v. State, 563 P.2d 232,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 251

(Wyo. 1977), overruled in part, Wilson v. State, 655 P.2d 1246,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 407

(Wyo. 1982).

The prejudice to the defendant from a 62-day delay between accusation and trial, where the defendant did not make a request for speedy trial until almost a month following the indictment, and where part of the reason for the delay was because of attempts to negotiate and settle the case before trial, was not of such a magnitude that would cause reversal. Tageant v. State, 683 P.2d 667,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 304

(Wyo. 1984).

The defendant's constitutional right to a speedy trial was not violated under the following facts: (1) although there was a sufficient unnecessary delay — six months — to trigger the applicable four-part balancing test, the delay was not outrageous; (2) while the prosecutor did not have a good reason for the delay — his indecision as to the constitutionality of the original charge, aggravated vehicular homicide —, at least his motives were legitimate; (3) the defendant preserved his speedy trial right by raising timely objections; but (4) the defendant could not prove prejudice, in that the testimony of his chief witness, who disappeared before trial, was stipulated to by the prosecution, and in that he was free on bond during the entire proceeding. Caton v. State, 709 P.2d 1260,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 621

(Wyo. 1985).

Where the total elapsed time, excluding the period between the state's dismissal and refiling of the complaint, was 320 days, the defendant's right to a speedy trial was not denied; the delay attributable to the state was justified because it was the result of a missing witness, and there was no evidence in the record to support any inference that the state requested the dismissal in bad faith or with a sinister motive. Wehr v. State, 841 P.2d 104,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 161

(Wyo. 1992).

After deduction of delays attributable to defendant's motions requesting a change in judges and objecting to extending the speedy trial date, only 113 days passed between the date of arrest and the time of trial, which was not significantly long, considering Wyo. R. Crim. P. 48 imposes a 120-day deadline. McDaniel v. State, 945 P.2d 1186,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 127

(Wyo. 1997).

Defendant's right to a speedy trial was not denied where the jury trial was set within a 120-day period and was continued for neutral reasons at the state's request within the 180-day deadline, after a hearing, and where defendant failed to prove prejudice based on pretrial anxiety and pretrial incarceration. Sides v. State, 963 P.2d 227,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 109

(Wyo. 1998).

Although the delay between defendant's arrest and his change of plea was over a year, defendant was not denied his constitutional right to a speedy preliminary hearing and trial where the other three factors outlined in Barker v. Wingo, 407 U.S. 514, 33 L. Ed. 2d 101, 92 S. Ct. 2182, 1972 U.S. LEXIS 34 (1972), weighed heavily against defendant. Almada v. State, 994 P.2d 299,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 192

(Wyo. 1999).

Defendant's right to speedy trial was not violated despite passage of 174 days between his arraignment and trial, since first continuance was due to crowded nature of trial court's docket, and second continuance was granted at defense attorney's request. Germany v. State, 999 P.2d 63,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 56

(Wyo. 2000).

Although delay of 536 days between arrest and trial was presumptively prejudicial, defendant's right to speedy trial was not violated; delay was caused by recording problems at various preliminary hearings and resulted in no actual prejudice to defendant, and she waited to assert her speedy trial rights until just a few days before trial. Campbell v. State, 999 P.2d 649,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 55

(Wyo. 2000).

W.R.Cr.P. 48(b) is a procedural rule that does not effect the substantive constitutional right to a speedy trial; therefore, an amended version of W.R.Cr.P. 48(b) that allows a longer time for trial applied to a kidnapping and sexual assault case, where the amended Rule 48(b) went into effect after defendant's arrest, but before defendant's arraignment. Dean v. State, 2003 WY 128, 77 P.3d 692,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 155

(Wyo. 2003).

In a vehicular homicide case, even though defendant's trial did not begin until 374 days after his arrest, defendant's right to a speedy trial was not violated where (1) three continuances were sought by the defendant due to the unavailability of trial witnesses and one continuance was sought in order to allow an expert witness to examine potentially exculpatory evidence regarding the subject vehicle; (2) there was no evidence indicating that the vehicle's condition was actually altered or somehow prevented the defendant or his expert from examining or testing the vehicle in anticipation of trial; and (3) defendant did not show any actual prejudice, citing only pretrial anxiety and not even his pretrial incarceration. Whitney v. State, 2004 WY 118, 99 P.3d 457,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 154

(Wyo. 2004), cert. denied, 544 U.S. 1001, 125 S. Ct. 1931, 161 L. Ed. 2d 775, 2005 U.S. LEXIS 3570 (U.S. 2005).

Defendant's right to a speedy trial was not violated because, although the delay of almost one year necessitated careful analysis, the length of the delay was not so excessive that it resulted in a presumption of prejudice. Defendant was prejudiced to a very limited extent as a result of the delay, but his much weightier contribution to the delay - for example, he requested a mental evaluation, but then told the examiner not to complete and finalize the report - counseled against finding that he was denied his constitutional right to a speedy trial.
Potter v. State, 2007 WY 83, 158 P.3d 656,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 90

(Wyo. 2007).

Defendant's constitutional rights to a speedy trial under the Sixth Amendment to the United States Constitution and Wyo. Const. art. 1, § 10 were not violated because the nearly five-month delay was not extraordinary, defendant acquiesced in the delay until he thought the speedy trial clock had run, the delay was caused by the overcrowded docket and some inattention to speedy trial concerns, and defendant received full credit for the time spent in jail.
Seteren v. State, 2007 WY 144, 167 P.3d 20,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 156

(Wyo. 2007).

Where defendant was first indicted for murder in 1980 but charges were dismissed and then refiled in 2004, defendant's constitutional right to a speedy trial was not violated because although delay occurred in bringing defendant to trial and defendant asserted her right to a speedy trial, length of the delay was not unreasonable in light of the facts in this case and where defendant had not demonstrated actual prejudice arising from delay in criminal proceedings.
Humphrey v. State, 2008 WY 67, 185 P.3d 1236,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 69

(Wyo. 2008).

Defendant's right to a speedy trial was not violated by the passage of 411 days between the State's filing of charges against defendant and his trial where the defense bore the bulk of the responsibility for the delays due to a change in counsel and continuances, there was no allegation that the State deliberately attempted to delay the trial in order to hamper the defense, defendant did not vigorously assert his right to a speedy trial, and there was no showing that the victims' memories or testimony were affected by the delay. Griggs v. State, 2016 WY 16, 367 P.3d 1108,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 2016).

Conclusion that second trial would violate defendant's right
to a speedy trial premature. —

In defendant's aggravated assault case, after declaring a mistrial, a court erred by dismissing the case with prejudice where no speedy trial violation had occurred up to the point when the district court granted the mistrial and dismissed the case with prejudice. The district court's conclusion that any second trial would necessarily violate defendant's right to a speedy trial was premature. State v. Newman, 2004 WY 41, 88 P.3d 445,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 48

(Wyo. 2004).

Applying the speedy trial test from Barker v. Wingo, the Supreme Court concluded that the 637-day delay in bringing defendant to trial did not substantially impair defendant's right to a fair trial, and that defendant's right to speedy trial was not violated. Durkee v. State, 2015 WY 123, 357 P.3d 1106,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 142

(Wyo. 2015).

No violation of confrontation right by prohibiting cross-examination.

It was not an abuse of discretion to exclude a victim’s alleged prior false accusation of sexual assault because (1) the limited probative value of the evidence was outweighed by a risk of unfair prejudice, and, (2) due to the victim’s inability to recall the prior accusation, extensive, potentially inadmissible, evidence would have been required to admit the prior accusation.
Sparks v. State, 2019 WY 50, 440 P.3d 1095,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 5

0

(Wyo. 2019);
Booth v. Booth, 2019 WY 5, 432 P.3d 902,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 2019).

Effect of weather conditions or judge's illness. —

A defendant cannot be heard to claim that his rights to a speedy trial were violated because weather conditions or a judge's illness forced trial continuances. Heinrich v. State, 638 P.2d 641,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 405

(Wyo. 1981).

Delay by defendant waives safeguards. —

The defendant may be disentitled to speedy trial safeguards where the delay is all or partly the responsibility of the defendant. Cherniwchan v. State, 594 P.2d 464,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 406

(Wyo. 1979); Phillips v. State, 597 P.2d 456,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 497

(Wyo. 1979).

Where defendant was arrested for several counts of illegal possession of controlled substances, he entered plea of nolo contendere; because defendant did not assert a speedy trial defense in the district court and did not reserve his right to assert the issue on appeal, defendant waived his right to appeal this issue.
Miller v. State, 2009 WY 125, 217 P.3d 793,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 137

(Wyo. 2009).

Effect of pre-arrest and pre-indictment delay. —

A claim based solely on pre-arrest and pre-indictment delay does not raise any question under the speedy trial provision of the Wyoming constitution. Hovee v. State, 596 P.2d 1127,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 431

(Wyo. 1979).

Defendant in criminal prosecution is entitled to impartial jury, not sympathetic one.

A corollary to that rule is that a defendant is not entitled to a jury ignorant of current events. Smethurst v. State, 756 P.2d 196,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 87

(Wyo. 1988).

Juror exposure to publicity about criminal case is to be anticipated

and, indeed, jurors may even have formed an opinion as to the guilt of the accused, which, by itself, is not a ground for requiring a change of venue. The test is whether a juror can lay aside his opinion and render a verdict based on the evidence. Amin v. State, 811 P.2d 255,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 72

(Wyo. 1991).

Person accused of crime has no constitutional right to any particular method of selecting jury

and is entitled only to an impartial jury of the county and within those limits the legislature may define the qualifications of jurors. State v. Bolln, 10 Wyo. 439, 70 P. 1,

1902 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(Wyo. 1902).

Waiver of right to trial by impartial jury. —

With respect to the contention that the defendants, who were convicted of rape, were denied their right to a trial by an impartial jury where one of the jurors, a victim of a prior rape, had not disclosed that information at the voir dire examination, defendants not only waived that right as to this ground by their failure to examine with respect to it, but, furthermore, their failure to demonstrate on the record actual bias on the part of the juror would foreclose the possibility that they could, as a fundamental matter, claim any right to be relieved of the consequences of their waiver. Lopez v. State, 544 P.2d 855,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 159

(Wyo. 1976).

Passing jury panel for cause waived defendant's claim of reversible error for trial court's failure to dismiss a potential juror for cause. Prindle v. State, 945 P.2d 1180,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 123

(Wyo. 1997), overruled, Vaughn v. State, 962 P.2d 149,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 97

(Wyo. 1998).

Instruction regarding circumstantial evidence. —

Where circumstantial evidence is wholly relied on for conviction, trial court should instruct on the law regarding such evidence whether requested to do so or not, as being fundamental to the defendant's having a fair trial such as the constitution and laws guarantee to him. Gardner v. State, 27 Wyo. 316, 196 P. 750,

1921 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1921).

Instruction to deadlocked jury. —

An instruction given at a time when it appears a jury may be deadlocked must not have a coercive impact upon the jury. Hoskins v. State, 552 P.2d 342,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 204

(Wyo. 1976), reh'g denied, 553 P.2d 1390,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 213

(Wyo. 1976), cert. denied, 430 U.S. 956, 97 S. Ct. 1602, 51 L. Ed. 2d 806, 1977 U.S. LEXIS 1392 (U.S. 1977).

Communications from a judge to a jury are coercive when they possess the substantial propensity for prying minority jurors loose from beliefs they honestly have, constitute an undue intrusion into the jury's province and dilute the requirement of unanimity. Hoskins v. State, 552 P.2d 342,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 204

(Wyo. 1976), reh'g denied, 553 P.2d 1390,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 213

(Wyo. 1976), cert. denied, 430 U.S. 956, 97 S. Ct. 1602, 51 L. Ed. 2d 806, 1977 U.S. LEXIS 1392 (U.S. 1977).

A statement in an instruction to a deadlocked jury that the jury sitting is as competent as another is not coercive language in a supplemental instruction. Hoskins v. State, 552 P.2d 342,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 204

(Wyo. 1976), reh'g denied, 553 P.2d 1390,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 213

(Wyo. 1976), cert. denied, 430 U.S. 956, 97 S. Ct. 1602, 51 L. Ed. 2d 806, 1977 U.S. LEXIS 1392 (U.S. 1977).

Determination of whether shackling defendant is appropriate.
—

The court held that defendants are not to be shackled or otherwise physically restrained in the courtroom during a jury trial, nor should other exceptional security measures be utilized, unless the State first moves that such measures be utilized, the court has heard such motion, and after allowing the defendant an opportunity to contest the motion, the court has stated on the record the compelling reasons justifying the measures. Asch v. State, 2003 WY 18, 62 P.3d 945,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 2003).

Venue of prosecution was properly laid

in county where alleged libelous communication was received. State v. Levand, 37 Wyo. 372, 262 P. 24,

1927 Wyo. LEXIS 94

(Wyo. 1927), reh'g denied, 37 Wyo. 372, 262 P. 24,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1928).

Venue of prosecution was properly laid. —

Where there
was conflicting evidence on where the offense occurred, the location
of the offense could not be established with certainty, and therefore
the predicate requirement for considering alternative avenues for
establishing venue was met.
Anderson v. State, 2014 WY 74, 327 P.3d 89,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 79

(Wyo. 2014).

Venue provision does not apply to juvenile delinquency proceedings.
—

The venue provision in
Wyo. Const., art. 1, § 10, does not apply to juvenile delinquency proceedings which are, instead, controlled by
§

14-6-204

.NJC v. State (In the Interest of NJC), 913 P.2d 435,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 43

(Wyo. 1996).

Venue provision in Juvenile Court Act constitutional. —

The venue provision in the Juvenile Court Act which allows a juvenile delinquency proceeding to be brought where the alleged delinquent act occurs or where the juvenile resides is not in conflict with the venue provision of this section. This venue provision is inapplicable to juvenile delinquency matters because these proceedings are deemed not to be criminal.
NJC v. State (In the Interest of NJC), 913 P.2d 435,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 43

(Wyo. 1996).

Jurisdiction in county where threatening calls received. —

Section

1-7-102

(venue in criminal cases) and this section granted venue and jurisdiction in the county where the defendant made threatening phone calls, or where the phone calls were received, because the threats took effect in the county where they were received. McCone v. State, 866 P.2d 740,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 204

(Wyo. 1993), reh'g denied,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. Feb. 2, 1994).

Change in venue due to pretrial publicity was not warranted.
—

Defendant was not denied a fair trial due to the trial court's denial of his motion for a change of venue due to pretrial publicity about defendant's crimes and a separate investigation in which he was a murder suspect because although there were 12 articles published about defendant none was sensational or inflammatory and the last was published three months before trial and also because only five of 48 prospective jurors expressed concern about their ability to be impartial in light of the pretrial publicity, none of the five was seated on the jury, and the record did not indicate that it was difficult to seat an impartial jury. Urbigkit v. State, 2003 WY 57, 67 P.3d 1207,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 70

(Wyo. 2003).

In a murder case, a court properly denied defendant's motion for change of venue where the news articles were generally factual in nature, reporting information obtained from court documents and from a potential witness, and they were not sensational, inflammatory, or prejudicial. Defense counsel and the trial court appropriately and properly examined the jury venire, and there was no indication that the pretrial publicity made jury selection difficult or created such prejudice that a change of venue was necessary. Duke v. State, 2004 WY 120, 99 P.3d 928,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 157

(Wyo. 2004), cert. denied, 544 U.S. 1062, 125 S. Ct. 2513, 161 L. Ed. 2d 1113, 2005 U.S. LEXIS 4397 (U.S. 2005).

In defendant's felony murder case, the trial court did not err by failing to grant a change of venue because sixty-five jurors were summoned for the trial, of those, 12 had heard about the case, and each of those jurors was closely examined. One juror expressed a view that he could not put aside his opinion and he was excused for cause, and at the close of voir dire, defendant passed the jury for cause and had no objections to the jury selection. Lemus v. State, 2007 WY 111, 162 P.3d 497,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 120

(Wyo. 2007).

Effect of statutory repeal. —

Repeal of statutory provision which allowed accused to secure change of magistrate upon preliminary examination did not deprive one accused of committing crime before such repeal of any substantial right or protection. People ex rel. Chandler v. McDonald, 5 Wyo. 526, 42 P. 15,

1895 Wyo. LEXIS 45

(Wyo. 1895).

Appeal to district court from police justice. —

On appeal to district court from a police justice, provision in city charter that such case shall stand trial in the district court upon transcript and that no trial de novo shall be had, was held not violative of this section.
Stutsman v. Cheyenne, 18 Wyo. 491, 113 P. 321,

1911 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 1911).

No Brady violation. —

Because defendant had knowledge of information that an accomplice would have provided testified about in order to impeach a witness, there was no Brady violation by the state's failure to provide defendant with information regarding the accomplice's knowledge; in addition, the evidence was not material because defendant had already vigorously assaulted the witness that the accomplice's testimony would have discredited.
Hicks v. State, 2008 WY 83, 187 P.3d 877,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 85

(Wyo. 2008).

Consideration of errors on appeal. —
